Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 7. LOCAL AND SPECIAL LAWS

CHAPTER 130. CALLAHAN COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER B. LAKE BAIRD

Sec. 130.013. DISCHARGE OF FIREARM. (a) Except as provided in this section, no person may shoot, fire, or discharge any pistol or rifle in, on, along, or across Lake Baird in Callahan County.

(b) This section does not apply to peace officers or other representatives of the department in the conduct of their official duties.

(c) This section does not apply to a person hunting with a shotgun during an open season in Callahan County.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.